Missouri, session 2026, HB2269.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 650.240, RSMo, is repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as sections 320.405 and 650.240, to read as follows:
320.405. 1. For purposes of this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Division", the Missouri division of fire safety within the department of
public safety;
(2) "Missouri fire and life safety standards", minimum fire‑protection and
life‑safety requirements adopted by the division under this section, informed by
nationally recognized fire and building safety principles including, but not limited to,
best practices reflected in the International Fire Code (IFC), the International Building
Code (IBC), and applicable National Fire Protection Association (NFPA) standards,
without adopting any model code in whole;
(3) "State-inspected facility", any building or occupancy required under
Missouri law or regulation to undergo fire‑safety inspections conducted by, or under the
authority of, the division.
2. (1) No later than July 1, 2027, the division shall, by rule, adopt Missouri fire
and life safety standards establishing minimum requirements for fire protection, means
of egress, fire resistance, detection and alarm systems, suppression systems, emergency
operations, and related safety measures for state‑inspected facilities.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 2269 2
(2) The division may incorporate by reference specific technical provisions,
methods, formulas, or performance criteria derived from nationally recognized fire and
building safety standards, provided that no model code shall be adopted in whole.
(3) The division may adopt amendments, exceptions, or Missouri‑specific
modifications as necessary to account for regional conditions, facility types, or statutory
requirements.
(4) The division shall review the Missouri fire and life safety standards at least
every five years and may update such standards by rule under chapter 536.
3. Beginning January 1, 2028, the Missouri fire and life safety standards shall
apply to a state‑inspected facility under any of the following conditions:
(1) Initial construction of a state‑inspected facility;
(2) Major renovation affecting means of egress, detection, alarm, or suppression
systems;
(3) Transfer of ownership, including sale, conveyance, merger, or change in
controlling interest; and
(4) Any addition, alteration, or series of related improvements to a
state‑inspected facility that, in aggregate, are reasonably determined by the division
to constitute a substantial improvement, meaning construction, reconstruction,
rehabilitation, or installation work where the total cost or scope of work equals or
exceeds fifty percent of the facility's pre‑improvement market value. For purposes of
this subdivision, a formal appraisal shall not be required, and the division may rely on
reasonable cost estimates, permit valuations, construction contracts, or the nature of the
work performed including, but not limited to, the installation of new fire protection,
detection, alarm, or suppression systems.
4. Except as provided in subsection 3 of this section, state‑inspected facilities
existing prior to August 28, 2026, shall be considered lawfully nonconforming and shall
not be required to comply with the Missouri fire and life safety standards.
5. (1) Nothing in this section shall prohibit any city, county, or fire protection
district from adopting requirements more stringent than the Missouri fire and life safety
standards.
(2) No political subdivision shall apply standards less stringent than the Missouri
fire and life safety standards to any facility regulated under this section.
(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed as creating a statewide building or
fire code applicable to any occupancy not already subject to inspection by the division.
6. (1) Compliance with the Missouri fire and life safety standards shall be
verified through inspections conducted by the division or an authorized local
jurisdiction.

HCS HB 2269 3
(2) A state‑inspected facility shall not be licensed, certified, or approved for
operation unless the division determines that the facility meets the applicable
requirements of this section.
(3) The division may issue correction orders, reinspections, or occupancy
limitations as authorized by law.
7. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it
complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers
vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the
effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional,
then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August
28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
650.240. The director shall employ deputy inspectors who shall be responsible to the
chief inspector [and who shall have had at the time of appointment not less than five years'
experience in the construction, installation, inspection, operation, maintenance, or repair of
high pressure boilers and pressure vessels as a mechanical engineer, steam operating
engineer, boilermaker, or boiler inspector, and who shall have passed the examination
provided for in section 650.250].
✔